Hawaii statutes.
§707-731 Sexual assault in the second
degree. (1) A person commits the offense of sexual assault in the second
degree if:

(a) The person knowingly subjects another person to
an act of sexual penetration by compulsion;

(b) The person knowingly subjects to sexual
penetration another person who is mentally incapacitated or physically
helpless;

(c) The person, while employed:

(i) In a state correctional facility;

(ii) By a private company providing services
at a correctional facility;

(iii) By a private company providing
community-based residential services to persons committed to the director of
public safety and having received notice of this statute;

(iv) By a private correctional facility
operating in the State of Hawaii; or

(v) As a law enforcement officer as defined
in section 710-1000,

knowingly subjects to sexual penetration an
imprisoned person, a person confined to a detention facility, a person
committed to the director of public safety, a person residing in a private
correctional facility operating in the State of Hawaii, or a person in custody;
provided that paragraph (b) and this paragraph shall not be construed to
prohibit practitioners licensed under chapter 453 or 455 from performing any
act within their respective practices; and further provided that this paragraph
shall not be construed to prohibit a law enforcement officer from performing a
lawful search pursuant to a warrant or exception to the warrant clause; or

(d) The person knowingly subjects to sexual
penetration a minor who is at least sixteen years old and the person is
contemporaneously acting in a professional capacity to instruct, advise, or
supervise the minor; provided that:

(i) The person is not less than five years
older than the minor; and

(ii) The person is not legally married to the
minor.

(2) Sexual assault in the second degree is a
class B felony. [L 1986, c 314, pt of §57; am L 1987, c 181, §10; am L 1997, c
366, §1; am L 2002, c 36, §1; am L 2004, c 61, §4; am L 2006, c 230, §33; am L
2009, c 11, §73; am L 2016, c 153, §1]

Case Notes

Because sexual assault in the fourth degree in violation of
§707-733(1)(a) and attempted sexual assault in the fourth degree in violation
of §§705-500 and 707-733(1)(a) are included offenses of charged offense of attempted
sexual assault in the second degree in violation of §§705-500 and
707-731(1)(a), circuit court erred in refusing, over appellant's objection, to
instruct jury with respect to them. 79 H. 46, 897 P.2d 973 (1995).

Evidence sufficient to establish absence of consent and thus
sufficient to establish element of "compulsion". 81 H. 39, 912 P.2d
71 (1996).

State must prove beyond a reasonable doubt that complainant
was mentally defective, mentally incapacitated, or physically helpless and
defendant was aware that complainant was such a person. 81 H. 447 (App.), 918
P.2d 254 (1996).

An imprisoned person's consent to "sexual penetration"
by an employee of a state correctional facility is ineffective and thus is not
a defense to a charge brought under subsection (1)(c). 86 H. 426 (App.), 949
P.2d 1047 (1997).

Subsection (1)(c) not unconstitutionally vague. 86 H. 426
(App.), 949 P.2d 1047 (1997).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next